foma_files/spellchecker.foma
# set char-encoding utf-8
# -*- encoding: utf-8 -*-



############################################################################### 

    #########################
    #                       #
    # PHONETIC VARIATIONS   #
    #                       #
    #########################

    # 4 SK vowels + rest for Spanish compatibility
    define Vowels [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú];

    # 15 SK consonants + rest for Spanish compatibility
    define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|[{sh}]|[{ch}]|[{ts}]];

    # only 3 consonants (4 phonemes, 3 realizations) can become coda
    define ConsCoda [n|s|{sh}];

    #--------------------------#
    # allow uppercase letters  #
    #--------------------------#

    define LowerCase [A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c,D (->) d,E (->) e,F (->) f,G (->) g,H (->) h,I (->) i,J (->) j,K (->) k,L (->) l,M (->) m,N (->) n,O (->) o,P (->) p,Q (->) q,R (->) r,S (->) s,T (->) t,U (->) u,V (->) v,W (->) w,X (->) x,Y (->) y,Z (->) z,Ñ (->) ñ, Á (->) á, É (->) é, Í (->) í, Ó (->) ó, Ú (->) ú ];

    define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ, á (->) Á, é (->) É, í (->) Í, ó (->) Ó, ú (->) Ú ];

   
    #-------------------------------------------------#
    # Orthography of Spanish loan words:              #
    #                                                 #
    #- may be written with or without their accents   #
    #- e may be written as i, o as u in Spanish words #
    #-------------------------------------------------#
    define AccentES [ á (->) a,é (->) [e|i],í (->) i, ó (->) [o|u],ú (->) u, ü (->) u, Á (->) A, É (->) E, Í (->) I, Ó (->) O, Ú (->) U];
    define AccentES2 [ a (->) á,e (->) é, i (->) í,o (->) ó, u (->) ú, u (->) ü ];
    
    define SpanOrtho AccentES .o. AccentES2;


####################################################################################

    ##########
    #        #
    # ROOTS  #
    #        #
    ##########

    ## NOUNS

    # Spanish roots
    source nroot-es.foma

    source NP.foma

    source nroot.foma

    ## VERBS

    source vroot-trans.foma

    source vroot-intrans.foma
    
    source vroot-disyllabic.foma

    ## POSTPOSITIONS

    source postp-roots.foma

    ## ADJECTIVES

    source adj-root.foma

    ## NUMERALS
    
    source num-root-card.foma

    ## ADVERBS

    source adv-root.foma

    ## CONJUNCTIONS (C & S)
    # roots defined in develop file

    ## INTERJECTIONS
    source interj-root.foma

    ## PARTICLES (ONOMATOPIES)
    source part-root.foma

    ## COMMON SUFFIXES
    source common.foma

    ## ALLOMORPHS: rules for allomorph realization
    source n-allomorphs.foma

    source v-allomorphs.foma

    
####################################################################################

    ##########
    #        #
    # VERB   #
    #        #
    ##########

    source verbs.foma


####################################################################################

    ##########
    #        #
    # AUX    #
    #        #
    ##########

    source aux.foma


######################################################################################
     
    ######################
    #                    #
    # LOAN WORDS         #
    #                    #
    ######################

#    define NRootES [NRootESraw] .o. SpanOrtho .o. UpperCase .o. LowerCase;

#    define loan=words [ ["[NOUN] " : 0] NRootES ];



####################################################################################

    ##########
    #        #
    # NOUNS  #
    #        #
    ##########

    source nouns.foma


 ######################################################################################
     
    ######################
    #                    #n
    # PRONOUNS           #
    #                    #
    ######################

    source pronouns.foma

 ######################################################################################
     
    ######################
    #                    #
    # INT / DET          #
    #                    #
    ######################
    source det-wh.foma

 ######################################################################################
     
    ######################
    #                    
    # POSTPOSITIONAL PHRASES           
    #                    
    ######################

    source postpositions.foma

####################################################################################

    ##############
    #            #
    # ADJECTIVES #
    #            #
    ##############

    source adj.foma

#########################################################################

       
    ###########
    #         #
    # NUMERALS #
    #         #
    ###########


    source numerals.foma


####################################################################################

    ##############
    #            #
    # ADVERBS #
    #            #
    ##############

    source adv.foma

####################################################################################

    ################
    #              #
    # CONJUNCTIONS #
    #              #
    ################

    source conj.foma

####################################################################################

    ################
    #              #
    # INTERJECTIONS #
    #              #
    ################

    define interjections  [ ["[INTJ] " : 0] intj=roots ];


####################################################################################

    ################
    #              #
    # PARTICLES    #
    #              #
    ################

    define particles  [ ["[PART] " : 0] part=roots ];



#########################################################################

    #-------------#
    # Punctuation #
    #-------------#

#    source punctuation.foma



############################################################################### 


regex [
      verb=complete
      | auxiliar
      | interjections
      | nouns
      | proper=nouns
      | pronouns
      | interrogatives
      | determiners
      | postpositions
      | numerals
      | adjectives
      | adverbs
      | cconj
      | sconj
      | particles
      ] .l
      ;


write att spellcheck.att 
clear 
read att spellcheck.att 
read cmatrix typo.matrix 
save stack error_correction.fst 
